langs/is/common-aff.d/21_fallbeyging_hk.aff
#hk et agr
SFX 27	N 2
SFX 27	0	i	[^i]
SFX 27	0	s	.

#hk et gr
SFX 28	N 5
SFX 28	0	ið	[^i]
SFX 28	0	ð	i
SFX 28	0	inu	[^i]
SFX 28	0	nu	i
SFX 28	0	sins	.

#hk ft agr
SFX 29	N 4
SFX 29	0	um	[^i]
SFX 29	i	um	i
SFX 29	0	a	[^i]
SFX 29	i	a	i

#hk ft gr
SFX 30	N 6
SFX 30	0	in	[^i]
SFX 30	 0	n	i
SFX 30	0	unum	[^i]
SFX 30		i	unum	i
SFX 30	0	anna	[^i]
SFX 30	i	anna	i
